Hawaii statutes.
§249-17 False tag, license plate, bicycle
or moped, penalty. [Section effective January 1, 2017. For section
effective until December 31, 2016, see main volume.] Any person who uses a
tag, or license plate, not furnished in accordance with section 249-14 or
section 249-14.1, or who counterfeits any such tag, or license plate, or who
fraudulently removes such a tag, or license plate, from any bicycle or moped,
shall be fined not more than $500. [L 1896, c 51, pt of §13; RL 1925, §§1310,
1313; RL 1935, §2156; am L 1941, c 268, §20; RL 1945, §5703; RL 1955, §130-15;
HRS §249-17; am L 1978, c 175, §6; am L 1988, c 264, §6; am L 2016, c 200, §6]

§249-17 False tag, bicycle or moped,
penalty. Any person who uses a tag not furnished in accordance with section
249-14, or who counterfeits any such tag or who fraudulently removes such a tag
from any bicycle or moped, shall be fined not more than $500. [L 1896, c 51, pt
of §13; RL 1925, §§1310, 1313; RL 1935, §2156; am L 1941, c 268, §20; RL 1945,
§5703; RL 1955, §130-15; HRS §249-17; am L 1978, c 175, §6; am L 1988, c 264,
§6]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next